Nebraska, session 109, LB235.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB235 LB235
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 76-1446, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
76-1446 (1) Trial of the action for possession shall be held not
less than ten nor more than fourteen days after the issuance of the
summons, unless additional time is granted pursuant to court order. The
action shall be tried by the court without a jury. If the plaintiff
serves the summons in the manner provided in section 76-1442.01, the
action shall proceed as other actions for possession except that a money
judgment shall not be granted for the plaintiff.
(2) If judgment is rendered against the defendant for the
restitution of the premises, the court shall declare the forfeiture of
the rental agreement, and shall, at the request of the plaintiff or his
or her attorney, issue a writ of restitution, directing the constable or
sheriff to restore possession of the premises to the plaintiff on a
specified date not less more than ten days after issuance of the writ of
restitution. The court may order the writ of restitution to be executed
on a date less than ten days after its issuance only upon:
(a) A showing that the defendant poses a true and imminent threat to
the safety of other tenants, the landlord, or the landlord's employees or
agents; or
(b) The informed and express agreement of the parties.
(3) The plaintiff shall comply with the Disposition of Personal
Property Landlord and Tenant Act and subsection (5) of section 76-1414 in
the removal of personal property remaining on the premises at the time
possession of the premises is restored.
Sec. 2. Original section 76-1446, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-2-